Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-604
Board; adopt rules and regulations.

The board may enact rules and regulations relating to the administration of, but not inconsistent with, the Collection Agency Act.

Laws 1963, c. 500, § 8, p. 1595;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 81-8,165;

Laws 1984, LB 471, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 261, § 4.